Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 4 Town and City Directors

40-4-1.
Designation of directors.

The directors of public aid of the several cities and towns shall hereafter be known as “directors of public welfare,” and wherever in any general law, public law, or resolution of the general assembly, or in any document, record, instrument, or proceeding authorized by any law or resolution, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires, the words “director of public aid” or the words “directors of public aid,” or any reference to the director of public aid appear, the words or reference shall be construed to mean “director of public welfare” or “directors of public welfare” as the case may be.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2312, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 67, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

40-7-1

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.